California, session 20252026, AB307.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 91535 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:91535. Of the funds made available by Section 91500, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection for technologies that improve detection and assessment of new fire ignitions. ignitions, of which ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be allocated for purposes of the ALERTCalifornia fire camera mapping system.